Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
Article 1 General Provisions

13-5-1.
Pleading of facts indicating contract not obligatory generally.

Any fact going to show that a contract was not obligatory, though executed, may be pleaded as a defense.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2797; Code 1868, § 2805; Code 1873, § 2856; Code 1882, § 2856; Civil Code 1895, § 3706; Civil Code 1910, § 4300; Code 1933, § 20-901.

13-5-2.
Incapacity generally.

A person may plead his own incapacity to contract.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2698; Code 1868, § 2694; Code 1873, § 2736; Code 1882, § 2736; Civil Code 1895, § 3653; Civil Code 1910, § 4238; Code 1933, § 20-208.

13-5-3.
Exemption from contractual liability of minor.

The exemption of a minor from contractual liability is a personal privilege. The party contracting with a minor may not plead it unless he was ignorant of the fact at the time of the contract nor may third persons avail themselves of it as a defense.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2694; Code 1868, § 2690; Code 1873, § 2732; Code 1882, § 2732; Civil Code 1895, § 3649; Civil Code 1910, § 4234; Code 1933, § 20-202.

Section does not affect proper method of suing and serving infants. —

Exemption of infant generally from liability on the infant’s contract is a personal privilege, but this does not affect proper method of suing and serving an infant. Maryland Cas. Co. v. Lanham, 124 Ga. 859, 53 S.E. 395, 1906 Ga. LEXIS 645 (1906); Miller v. Luckey, 132 Ga. 581, 64 S.E. 658, 1909 Ga. LEXIS 364 (1909).

13-5-4.
Mistake of fact or law.

If the consideration upon which a contract is based was given as a result of a mutual mistake of fact or of law, the contract cannot be enforced.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2707; Code 1868, § 2701; Code 1873, § 2743; Code 1882, § 2743; Civil Code 1895, § 3660; Civil Code 1910, § 4245; Code 1933, § 20-308.

13-5-5.
Fraud.

Fraud renders contracts voidable at the election of the injured party.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2715; Code 1868, § 2709; Code 1873, § 2751; Code 1882, § 2751; Civil Code 1895, § 3669; Civil Code 1910, § 4254; Code 1933, § 20-502.

13-5-6.
Duress.

Since the free assent of the parties is essential to a valid contract, duress, either by imprisonment, threats, or other acts, by which the free will of the party is restrained and his consent induced, renders the contract voidable at the election of the injured party. Legal imprisonment, if not used for illegal purposes, does not constitute duress.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2716; Code 1868, § 2710; Code 1873, § 2752; Code 1882, § 2752; Civil Code 1895, § 3670; Civil Code 1910, § 4255; Code 1933, § 20-503.

13-5-7.
Rescission or release.

A rescission of a contract by consent or a release by the other contracting party shall be a complete defense.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2800; Code 1868, § 2808; Code 1873, § 2859; Code 1882, § 2859; Civil Code 1895, § 3710; Civil Code 1910, § 4304; Code 1933, § 20-905.

13-5-8.
Noncompliance with condition, failure of consideration, or other act as defense.

A condition, precedent or subsequent, not complied with, insufficiency or failure of consideration, or any act of the opposite party, by which the obligation of the contract has ceased, may be pleaded as a defense.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2798; Code 1868, § 2806; Code 1873, § 2857; Code 1882, § 2857; Civil Code 1895, § 3707; Civil Code 1910, § 4301; Code 1933, § 20-902.

13-5-9.
Total or partial failure of consideration generally.

If the consideration for a promise, apparently good or valuable, fails either wholly or in part before the promise is executed, the failure of consideration may be pleaded in defense to the promise as provided for in subsection (c) of Code Section 9-11-8. If the failure of consideration is partial, an apportionment shall be made according to the facts of each case.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2712; Code 1868, § 2706; Code 1873, § 2748; Code 1882, § 2748; Civil Code 1895, § 3665; Civil Code 1910, § 4250; Code 1933, § 20-310.

13-5-10.
Failure to perform dependent covenant.

Where covenants are dependent, the failure of performance by the opposing party may be a good defense.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2799; Code 1868, § 2807; Code 1873, § 2858; Code 1882, § 2858; Civil Code 1895, § 3709; Civil Code 1910, § 4303; Code 1933, § 20-904.

13-5-11.
Part performance.

In a severable contract or one admitting of apportionment, a part performance may be a defense pro tanto.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2813; Code 1868, § 2821; Code 1873, § 2872; Code 1882, § 2872; Civil Code 1895, § 3726; Civil Code 1910, § 4320; Code 1933, § 20-1103.